Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.971

Law enforcement mobilization—State law enforcement mobilization policy board—State law enforcement mobilization plan.

(1) The state law enforcement mobilization policy board shall be established by the chief and shall have representatives from each of the regions established in RCW 43.43.974. In carrying out its duty, the board shall consult with and solicit recommendations from representatives of the state and local law enforcement and emergency management organizations, and regional law enforcement mobilization committees.

(2) The board shall establish and make recommendations to the chief on the refinement and maintenance of the Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan, including the procedures to be used during an emergency or disaster response requiring coordination of local, regional, and state law enforcement resources.

(3) The chief shall review the Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan, as submitted by the board, recommend changes as necessary, and may approve the plan. The plan shall be consistent with the Washington state comprehensive emergency management plan. The chief may recommend the plan for inclusion within the state comprehensive emergency management plan established under chapter 38.52 RCW.

[ 2003 c 405 s 7.]